Utah statutes.
59-2-1334.   Omission, error, or defect in delinquent lists -- Republication.

(1)  If an omission, error, or defect is in a delinquent list or any publication, the list or publication may be republished as amended, or notice of the correction may be given in a supplementary publication.

(2)  Any republication shall be made in the same manner as the original publication, for not less than one week.

